vowel-alternations.xfst
# -*- encoding: utf-8 -*-
# vowel-alternations.xfst
clear
define RC [ $ ∅ ] ;
regex [ ə -> ɛ || _ RC ] ;
regex [ "/" -> t || t _ RC ] ;
regex [ "/" -> l || l _ RC ] ;
regex [ e -> ɛ || "/" _ RC ] ;
regex [ e -> é || "/" _ "/" ] ;
regex [ ɛ -> è ] ;
regex [ ə -> e ] ;
regex [ ∅ -> 0 ] ; 
regex [ "/" -> 0 ] ;
turn stack
compose
save stack vowel-alternations.fst
down décr/e/t^∅e
down dér/e/gl^∅erai
down dér/e/gl^ons
down səm^∅e
down səm^∅erai
down səm^ons
down səm^é
